Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
305J

POST-SECONDARY
EDUCATION AUTHORIZATION

Section

305J-1 Post-secondary education authorization
program;

establishment

305J-2 Definitions

305J-3 Applicability of chapter; exceptions

305J-4 Authorization of the University of Hawaii
system

305J-5 Powers and duties of the director

305J-6 Department's powers and authority

305J-7 Awarding degrees

305J-8 Authorization to operate in the State;
private

college or university

305J-9 Authorization to operate in the State;
seminary

or religious training institutions

305J-10 Reauthorization

305J-11 Grounds for refusal to reauthorize,
reinstate,

or restore and for revocation,
suspension,

probation, or denial; condition of
authorization

or sanctions

305J-11.5 Opportunity for administrative hearing

305J-12 Requirements to maintain authorization

305J-13 Deposit of records upon discontinuance

305J-14 Financial integrity; surety bond

305J-15 Claims against a private college or
university;

cessation of operation; alternative
enrollment

305J-16 Reciprocity

305J-17 Complaints; injunctive proceedings

305J-18 Fees; public hearing

305J-19 Post-secondary education authorization
special

subaccount

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next